District of Columbia statutes.
8-1771.02

Scope.

(a)

This chapter shall apply to the following types of new products sold, offered for sale, or installed in the District of Columbia:

(1)

Bottle-type water dispensers;

(2)

Commercial hot food holding cabinets;

(3)

Metal halide lamp fixtures;

(4)

Single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies;

(5)

State-regulated incandescent reflector lamps;

(6)

Walk-in refrigerators or freezers; and

(7)

Any other products designated by the Mayor in accordance with § 8-1771.04.

(b)

This chapter shall not apply to:

(1)

New products manufactured in the District of Columbia and sold outside the District of Columbia;

(2)

New products manufactured outside the District of Columbia and sold at wholesale inside the District for final retail sale and installation outside the District of Columbia;

(3)

Products installed in mobile manufactured homes at the time of construction; or

(4)

Products designed expressly for installation and use in recreational vehicles.

History

Dec. 11, 2007, D.C. Law 17-64, § 3, 54 DCR 10964

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-1771.04.